Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1729
Access to public roads; right assured; landowners may waive; condemnation.

The right of reasonable convenient egress and ingress from lands or lots, abutting on an existing street or road, may not be denied except with the consent of the owners of such lands or lots, or with the condemnation of such right of access to and from such abutting lands or lots.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 29, p. 550.